Illinois, session 104th, HB4546.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Household Hazardous Waste Stewardship Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7    (1) It is in the best interest of the State of Illinois for 8manufacturers of products for household use that contain 9hazardous substances to assume responsibility for the 10development, financing, and implementation of a statewide 11stewardship program that conveniently serves all areas of the 12State for the collection and environmentally sound management 13of waste from those products. There are hundreds of products 14purchased by consumers that contain hazardous substances, 15including, but not limited to, aerosol products, fertilizers, 16herbicides, pesticides, fluorescent lamps, furniture stripper 17and varnish, gasoline, kerosene, used oil, antifreeze, 18household cleaners, solvent cleaners, and pool or hot tub 19chemicals. 20    (2) Improper management and disposal of household 21hazardous waste is a threat to public health and the 22environment. 23    (3) In 1991, the need for household hazardous waste   HB4546- 2 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1collection programs throughout the State was recognized and 2the Household Hazardous Waste Collection Act was enacted. 3Since then, the Illinois Environmental Protection Agency and 4local governments have worked together to support collection 5events and develop 5 permanent household hazardous waste 6collection facilities. However, these existing services do not 7provide convenient collection services statewide, and the cost 8of these programs for the Agency and local governments exceeds 9$11,000,000 annually.10    (4) In 2015, the Task Force on the Advancement of 11Materials Recycling issued a report to the General Assembly 12that unanimously recommended that a convenient statewide 13household hazardous waste collection infrastructure was 14needed. In 2021, the Statewide Materials Management Advisory 15Committee issued a report to the General Assembly that 16recommended up to 5 additional permanent household hazardous 17waste collection facilities be developed in the State. 18    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:19    "Agency" means the Illinois Environmental Protection 20Agency. 21    "Antifreeze" means propylene glycol or ethylene glycol, 22including aggregated batches of propylene glycol or ethylene 23glycol, used as a heat transfer medium in an internal 24combustion engine; heating, ventilating, and air conditioning 25units; and electronics cooling applications; or used for   HB4546- 3 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1winterizing equipment. 2    "Brand" means a name, symbols, words, or marks that 3identify a covered product and attribute the product to the 4owner of the brand as the manufacturer. 5    "Collection cost" means costs related to the collection of 6covered products, including, but not limited to: facility 7siting costs; facility permitting costs; facility construction 8costs; facility maintenance costs; equipment costs; fork lift 9costs; truck costs; labor and benefits; costs for supplies, 10including traffic control devices, test kits for unknown 11waste, tape, plastic sheeting, and spill clean-up kits; 12building and equipment maintenance costs; event costs, 13including marketing costs; third-party contractor costs, 14including event set-up costs; environmental service fees; 15insurance fees; costs for shipping containers and materials; 16pallet costs; and personal protective equipment costs. 17    "Collection site" means a permanent facility permitted by 18the Agency to accept, manage, and store covered products or a 19location where a one-day collection event is held to collect 20covered products which are then transported offsite for proper 21management. 22    "Covered entity" means any person who presents a covered 23product to a collection site from that person's use at a 24household, with the exception of large quantity generators, 25small quantity generators, or very small quantity generators. 26    "Covered product" means any product offered for retail   HB4546- 4 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1sale for household use contained in the receptacle in which 2the product is offered for retail sale, except for used oil, 3antifreeze, gasoline, and kerosene, if the product has any of 4the following characteristics: 5        (1) the physical properties of the product meet the 6    criteria for characteristic wastes under the federal 7    Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 42 U.S.C. 8    6901 et seq., including ignitability, corrosivity, 9    reactivity or toxicity as defined in 40 CFR 261.20 to 10    261.24; 11        (2) the physical properties of the product meet the 12    criteria for designation as a class 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, or 8 13    hazardous material, as defined in 49 CFR 173, by the 14    United States Department of Transportation under the 15    Hazardous Materials Transportation Act of 1975, 49 U.S.C. 16    5101 et seq.; or 17        (3) the product requires registration under the 18    Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 19    U.S.C. 136. 20    "Covered product" includes a product added by rule under 21Section 70 of this Act.22    "Covered product" does not include: 23        (1) automotive fluids, including, without limitation, 24    (i) household do-it-yourselfer used oil as defined under 25    35 Ill. Adm. Code 739.100 or successor rules and (ii) 26    antifreeze;  HB4546- 5 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1        (2) a covered battery, as defined in the Portable and 2    Medium-Format Battery Stewardship Act; 3        (3) a drug, as defined in 21 U.S.C. 321(g)(1); a 4    biological product, as defined in 42 U.S.C. 262(i); a 5    device, as defined by 21 U.S.C. 321(h)(1); or any 6    combination of those items; 7        (4) products sold for commercial agricultural use that 8    require registration under the Federal Insecticide, 9    Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. 136; 10        (5) architectural paint, as defined in the Paint 11    Stewardship Act; 12        (6) a covered electronic device, as defined in the 13    Consumer Electronics Recycling Act; 14        (7) a vitamin or dietary supplement; 15        (8) a liquefied petroleum or other gas container, 16    cylinder, or receptacle; 17        (9) a fire extinguisher; 18        (10) an oil filter; 19        (11) a smoke detector, ionizing type; 20        (12) ammunition, fireworks, explosives, and projectile 21    marine flares; 22        (13) potentially infectious medical waste, as defined 23    in Section 3.360 of the Illinois Environmental Protection 24    Act; 25        (14) electronic cigarettes, as defined in the 26    Prevention of Tobacco Use by Persons under 21 Years of Age   HB4546- 6 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1    and Sale and Distribution of Tobacco Products Act, and 2    their apparatuses, including, but not limited to, vape 3    pods; 4        (15) an antimicrobial product that requires 5    registration under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and 6    Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. 136, and is labeled in 7    accordance with federal requirements for pesticide 8    products intended for household use only; and 9        (16) a product that is subtracted by rule under 10    Section 70 of this Act. 11    "Disposal cost" means the costs related to the final 12disposition of the collected covered products. 13    "Environmental justice community" means environmental 14justice community, as determined by the Agency. 15    "Environmentally sound management" means management 16practices implemented in a manner that is designed to protect 17public health, safety, and the environment, including, but not 18limited to: 19        (1) adequate recordkeeping; 20        (2) keeping detailed documentation of the methods used 21    to: 22            (A) manage covered products; and 23            (B) track and document the fate of covered 24        products from collection through final disposition 25        within this State and outside this State; 26        (3) performance audits and inspections;   HB4546- 7 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1        (4) compliance with worker health and safety 2    requirements; and 3        (5) maintenance of adequate environmental liability 4    insurance and financial assurances for a stewardship 5    organization and contractors working for the stewardship 6    organization. 7    "Final disposition" means the point beyond which no 8further processing takes place and the covered product has 9been either transformed for direct use as a feedstock in 10producing new products, discarded in a manner approved by the 11Agency, processed for energy recovery in permitted facilities, 12or incinerated without energy recovery in permitted 13facilities. 14    "Manufacturer" means a person who: 15        (1) manufactures or manufactured a covered product 16    under its own brand or label for sale in the State; 17        (2) sells in the State under its own brand or label a 18    covered product produced by another supplier; 19        (3) owns a brand that it licenses or licensed to 20    another person for use on a covered product sold in the 21    State; 22        (4) imports a covered product manufactured by a person 23    without a presence in the United States into the United 24    States for sale in the United States; 25        (5) manufactures a covered product for sale in the 26    State without affixing a brand name; or   HB4546- 8 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1        (6) is the manufacturer of a covered product sold, 2    offered for sale, or distributed in or into this State, as 3    defined in this Section, except if another party has 4    contractually accepted responsibility as a responsible 5    manufacturer and has joined a stewardship organization as 6    the manufacturer for that covered product. 7    "Orphan covered product" means a covered product for which 8no manufacturer can be identified. 9    "Person" has the meaning given to that term in Section 103.315 of the Environmental Protection Act. 11    "Premium collection service" means collection service 12provided at a location that is not a collection site such as 13at-home pickup service, including curbside pickup service. 14    "Program year" means a calendar year. The first program 15year is 2028. 16    "Retailer" means a person who first sells, through any 17means, including a sales outlet, catalog, the Internet, or 18electronic means, a covered product to a customer for 19residential use or any permanent establishment where 20merchandise is displayed, held, stored, or offered for sale to 21the public. 22    "Stewardship organization" means a manufacturer that 23directly implements a stewardship program required under this 24Act, a corporation designated by a manufacturer or group of 25manufacturers to implement a stewardship program under this 26Act, or a nonprofit organization designated by a manufacturer   HB4546- 9 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1or group of manufacturers to implement a stewardship program 2under this Act. 3    "Stewardship plan" means a plan developed by a 4manufacturer or a stewardship organization that is consistent 5with this Act and approved by the Agency.6    "Stewardship program" means a program implemented by a 7stewardship organization consistent with this Act and the 8approved stewardship plan. 9    "Transfer facility" has the meaning given to that term in 1035 Ill. Adm. Code 723.112 or successor rules. 11    "Transfer station" has the meaning given to that term in 12Section 3.500 of the Environmental Protection Act. 13    "Transportation cost" means the cost associated with 14loading and shipping covered products to a transfer station, 15transfer facility, or final disposition location. 16    Section 15. Requirement that manufacturers implement a 17stewardship program.18    (a) Beginning January 1, 2028, a manufacturer selling, 19making available for sale, or distributing covered products in 20or into the State of Illinois shall participate in an approved 21stewardship plan. 22    (b) Beginning January 1, 2028, no manufacturer shall sell 23covered products in or into the State who does not participate 24in a stewardship organization and stewardship plan. 25    (c) Beginning January 1, 2028, no manufacturer shall sell   HB4546- 10 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1covered products in or into the State if the covered product is 2not labeled with a brand or if the original manufacturer is not 3identified on the label. 4    Section 20. Manufacturer obligations.5    (a) A manufacturer shall establish, fund, and implement a 6stewardship program individually or collectively as part of a 7stewardship organization. The proportion of funding by 8manufacturers shall be: 9        (1) 50% of the collection cost for all collection 10    sites in an approved stewardship program in program year 11    2028, 60% of the collection cost for all collection sites 12    in an approved stewardship program in program year 2029, 13    70% of the collection cost for all collection sites in an 14    approved stewardship program in program year 2030, 80% of 15    the collection cost for all collection sites in an 16    approved stewardship program in program year 2031, and 90% 17    of the collection cost for all collection sites in an 18    approved stewardship program in each program year 19    thereafter; and20        (2) 100% of the transportation cost and disposal cost 21    for covered products and orphan covered products collected 22    in accordance with this Act; and23        (3) 100% of the collection cost, transportation cost, 24    and disposal cost for collection sites operated by the 25    stewardship organization.  HB4546- 11 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1        (4) 60% of the capital cost to construct a new, 2    permanent household hazardous waste collection facility if 3    a unit of local government has secured at least 40% of the 4    capital cost needed for construction on or between January 5    1, 2028 and January 1, 2030.6    (b) If there is more than one stewardship organization 7representing manufacturers, manufacturers shall jointly submit 8a single stewardship plan that meets the requirements of 9Section 40 and a single annual report that meets the 10requirements of Section 55.11    (c) If there is more than one stewardship organization, 12manufacturers shall designate one stewardship organization to 13enter into mutual agreements with collection sites. 14    (d) Each stewardship organization shall equitably allocate 15stewardship program costs to manufacturers participating in 16the stewardship program. The method of cost allocation shall 17be included in the stewardship plan required under Section 40.18    (e) A manufacturer, stewardship organization, or retailer 19shall not charge: 20        (1) a specific point-of-sale fee to a covered entity 21    to recoup the costs of the stewardship program; or 22        (2) a specific fee at the time the covered products 23    are collected from a covered entity. 24    (f) A manufacturer or stewardship organization shall not 25charge a fee to any person collecting covered products under 26this Act.   HB4546- 12 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1    (g) Beginning January 1, 2028, units of local government 2and any person with a permanent collection site, an Agency 3sponsored one-day collection site, or a contractually 4obligated one-day collection site shall be included in the 5stewardship organization's plan and stewardship program and 6shall be counted toward complying with the collection 7requirements in Section 50. A stewardship organization must 8reimburse collection sites for collection costs incurred due 9to serving as a collection site for a stewardship program in 10accordance with this Section. A stewardship organization must 11establish a mutual agreement with each collection site and 12provide reimbursement for collection costs no less frequently 13than every 3 months.14    (h) A stewardship organization must accept and fund the 15collection, transportation, and disposal costs associated with 16orphan covered products. 17    (i) A stewardship organization is not responsible for 18funding the cost associated with premium collection service. 19    Section 25. Manufacturer registration.20    (a) By April 1, 2027, and by April 1 of each year 21thereafter for the upcoming program year, beginning with 22program year 2028, each manufacturer who sells covered 23products in the State must register with a stewardship 24organization by submitting to the stewardship organization a 25list of all the brands under which the manufacturer sells or   HB4546- 13 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1offers for sale in the State. Each stewardship organization 2shall subsequently register with the Agency, on a form 3prescribed by the Agency, and provide a list of all the brands 4and manufacturers covered by the stewardship organization. 5    (b) By January 1, 2028, each stewardship organization 6shall post on the single, coordinated website, as required by 7Section 40, a list of all registered manufacturers and 8associated brands. 9    (c) Beginning in program year 2028, a manufacturer whose 10covered products are sold or offered for sale in this State for 11the first time on or after April 1 of the program year must 12register with a stewardship organization within 30 days after 13the date the covered products are first sold or offered for 14sale in the State. The stewardship organization must provide 15the Agency the name of the manufacturer and its brand or 16brands, in writing, within 30 days of the date the 17manufacturer registered with the stewardship organization. 18    (d) Beginning in program year 2028, no manufacturer may 19sell or offer to sell a covered product in this State unless 20the manufacturer is registered and operates a stewardship 21program either individually or as part of a stewardship 22organization. 23    Section 28. Household hazardous waste needs assessment.24    (a) Each stewardship organization shall jointly prepare 25and equitably share in the cost for the preparation of a single   HB4546- 14 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1household hazardous waste needs assessment. The needs 2assessment shall be completed and submitted to the Agency no 3later than January 1, 2027.4    (b) The needs assessment shall address, at a minimum, the 5following:6        (1) a description of the Agency's program for 7    collecting household hazardous waste in the State, 8    including a listing of all collection sites and the 9    disposal costs for each collection site on an annual basis 10    for calendar years 2023, 2024, and 2025;11        (2) an evaluation of the Agency's current contract for 12    disposal of household hazardous waste, including the scope 13    of acceptable wastes allowed under the contract and the 14    costs for disposal of the wastes on a unit cost basis;15        (3) an evaluation of household hazardous waste 16    collected by each collection site by type of waste as 17    reported to the Agency by the collection sites and by the 18    Agency's disposal contractor;19        (4) an estimate of the collection costs incurred by 20    the collection sites in calendar years 2023, 2024, and 21    2025;22        (5) a detailed analysis of household hazardous waste 23    collected by the permanent collection sites by waste type, 24    brand, and manufacturer and amount by volume or weight for 25    each manufacturer of the products;26        (6) an evaluation of the potential for reuse or   HB4546- 15 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1    recycling of household hazardous waste currently collected 2    by collection sites, including an estimate of the total 3    amount of household hazardous waste collected in calendar 4    year 2025 that may have been suitable for reuse or 5    recycling and the cost savings compared to disposal if the 6    waste had been reused or recycled;7        (7) a comparison of the scope of covered products, as 8    defined in Section 10 of this Act, to the acceptable 9    wastes collected under the Agency's current contract;10        (8) an estimate of collection costs and disposal costs 11    to meet the collection requirements in Section 50 of this 12    Act;13        (9) an estimate of the impact of the following 14    education programs on the cost to dispose of household 15    hazardous waste collected in 2025: education programs 16    directed at encouraging consumers to purchase only the 17    products and amounts that are necessary, to avoid waste, 18    and to avoid the necessity of taking a product to a 19    collection site; and20        (10) an evaluation of the method and cost for 21    manufacturers to be responsible under the federal 22    Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and 23    Liability Act (CERCLA) for the final disposal of the 24    covered products. 25    Section 30. Role of retailers.  HB4546- 16 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1    (a) Beginning July 1, 2028, a retailer may not sell, offer 2for sale, distribute, or otherwise make available for sale a 3covered product unless the manufacturer of the covered product 4is identified as a participant in a stewardship organization 5whose stewardship plan has been approved by the Agency. 6    (b) A retailer is not in violation of the requirements of 7subsection (a) of this Section if the information on the 8single, coordinated website made available under subsection 9(b) of Section 25 lists the manufacturer as a participant in a 10stewardship organization whose stewardship plan has been 11approved by the Agency. 12    (c) A retailer selling or offering covered products for 13sale in the State shall provide information to covered 14entities, provided by the stewardship organization, regarding 15available end-of-life management options for covered products. 16The information that a stewardship organization must make 17available to retailers for use by retailers must include, but 18is not limited to, in-store signage, written materials, and 19other promotional materials that retailers may use to inform 20customers of the available end-of-life management options for 21covered products. 22    Section 35. Role of collection sites.23    (a) Collection sites must keep accurate records to 24demonstrate collection costs associated with the stewardship 25program.   HB4546- 17 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1    (b) Collection sites must provide data as required by a 2stewardship organization to comply with the requirements of 3Section 55. 4    Section 40. Stewardship plan components.5    (a) By June 1, 2027, each stewardship organization must 6coordinate and submit to the Agency for approval a single 7stewardship plan for covered products. The Agency shall review 8and approve a plan based on whether it: 9        (1) lists each manufacturer and brand of covered 10    products registered with each stewardship organization, 11    including manufacturers who have contractually accepted 12    responsibility as a manufacturer in accordance with 13    paragraph (6) of the definition of "manufacturer" in this 14    Act; 15        (2) provides for free, convenient, and accessible 16    statewide access for the collection of covered products 17    from covered entities in the State; 18        (3) describes how retailers will be made aware of 19    their obligation to sell only covered products from 20    manufacturers participating in an approved stewardship 21    plan; 22        (4) describes the education and communications 23    strategy being implemented to promote participation in the 24    stewardship program by covered entities and provides the 25    information necessary for effective participation in the   HB4546- 18 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1    stewardship program, including the development of a 2    single, coordinated website and providing information to 3    retailers under subsection (c) of Section 30 of this Act; 4        (5) describes the information to be provided on the 5    single, coordinated website, including, but not limited 6    to, information about collection site locations, including 7    a map showing the locations of all collection sites, hours 8    of operation, contact information, and a list of 9    acceptable covered products and nonacceptable items; 10        (6) describes efforts by manufacturers to reduce the 11    environmental health and safety impacts of covered 12    products; 13        (7) provides for the environmentally sound management 14    of covered products; 15        (8) provides the name, location, and permit status of 16    final disposition facilities where covered products will 17    be transported and the covered products managed by each 18    final disposition facility; 19        (9) demonstrates compliance with the collection 20    convenience standard requirements in Section 50; 21        (10) describes how data regarding the covered products 22    collected in a program year will be reported, including 23    independent data for each collection site regarding the 24    amount of covered products collected and the number of 25    covered entities that participated in the stewardship 26    program;   HB4546- 19 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1        (11) describes how a stewardship organization will 2    incorporate existing permanent collection sites and 3    one-day collection sites into the stewardship program;4        (12) describes how a stewardship organization will 5    incorporate new, permanent collection sites, developed 6    under paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of Section 20 of 7    this Act, into the stewardship program;8        (13) describes the method to establish and administer 9    a means for fully funding the stewardship program in a 10    manner that equitably distributes the stewardship 11    program's costs among the manufacturers that are part of 12    each stewardship organization and that provides for 13    sufficient funding to implement the program beginning 14    January 1, 2028; for manufacturers that choose to meet the 15    requirements of this Act individually, without joining a 16    stewardship organization, the plan must describe the 17    proposed method to establish and administer a means for 18    fully funding the stewardship program; and 19        (14) describes efforts that will be made to ensure 20    that areas designated as environmental justice communities 21    will have convenient access to collection sites. 22    (b) A stewardship organization must submit a new 23stewardship plan to the Agency for approval no less than every 245 years. 25    (c) A stewardship organization must provide plan 26amendments to the Agency for approval when proposing changes   HB4546- 20 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1to the approved stewardship plan or when requested by the 2Agency due to deficiencies in the stewardship program being 3implemented under the stewardship plan in effect. 4    Section 45. Stewardship plan approval.5    (a) The Agency shall approve the proposed stewardship plan 6if each manufacturer participating in the stewardship plan has 7registered under Section 25 and the stewardship plan 8demonstrates compliance with the requirements of Section 40. 9    (b) Within 90 days after receiving the stewardship plan, 10the Agency shall either approve, reject, or approve with 11modification the stewardship plan in writing for each 12stewardship organization. If the Agency rejects the 13stewardship plan, it shall provide the reason for the 14rejection in the written notification to the stewardship 15organization. 16    (c) No later than 60 days after receipt of a notice of 17rejection under subsection (b) of this Section, a revised 18stewardship plan must be submitted to the Agency. Within 30 19days after receipt of the revised stewardship plan, the Agency 20shall either approve or reject the revised stewardship plan in 21writing for the stewardship organization. 22    (d) After approval, manufacturers must, either 23individually or collectively as a stewardship organization, 24initiate operation of the stewardship program outlined in the 25stewardship plan no later than January 1, 2028.   HB4546- 21 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1    Section 50. Collection convenience standard requirements.2    (a) A stewardship organization implementing a stewardship 3plan must provide for the collection of all covered products 4to all covered entities on a free, continuous, and statewide 5basis. If there is more than one stewardship organization, 6those stewardship organizations may coordinate and meet the 7requirements of this Section jointly. 8    (b) For covered products, by the beginning of program year 92028, statewide collection requirements must include all 10permanent collection sites permitted to collect covered 11products as of January 1, 2028, all Agency sponsored one-day 12collection sites under which the Agency has an agreement to 13conduct one-day events, and all one-day collection sites that 14are contractually obligated by any person.15    (c) For covered products, statewide collection 16requirements by the beginning of program year 2030 must 17include:18        (1) at least one collection site that is a permanent 19    collection site for covered products within a 15-mile 20    radius for at least 60% of State residents; and 21        (2) at least one collection site that is a one-day 22    collection site for covered products within a 25-mile 23    radius for at least an additional 20% of State residents. 24    (d) For covered products, statewide collection 25requirements by the beginning of program year 2031 must   HB4546- 22 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1include: 2        (1) at least one collection site that is a permanent 3    collection site for covered products within a 15-mile 4    radius for at least 70% of State residents; and 5        (2) at least one collection site that is a one-day 6    collection site for covered products within a 25-mile 7    radius for at least 25% of State residents. 8    (e) Collection convenience shall be for at least the 9number of hours allowed by the site's Agency permit for a 10permanent collection site. Collection convenience for a 11one-day collection site shall be at least once per year or as 12contractually obligated and shall be at least 6 hours in 13length per collection event.14    (f) Any new, permanent household hazardous waste 15collection facility developed under paragraph (4) of 16subsection (a) of Section 20 of this Act shall be included in 17the stewardship program. 18    Section 55. Reporting requirements.19    (a) By June 1, 2029, and each June 1 thereafter, each 20stewardship organization must jointly submit a single annual 21report to the Agency covering the preceding program year and 22post the annual report on its website. The report must include 23the following: 24        (1) an independent financial assessment of the 25    stewardship program implemented by each stewardship   HB4546- 23 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1    organization, including a breakdown of the program's 2    expenses, including, but not limited to, collection cost, 3    disposal cost, transportation cost, and administrative 4    cost; 5        (2) a summary financial statement documenting the 6    financing of each stewardship organization's program and 7    an analysis of program costs and expenditures. A 8    stewardship organization implementing similar programs in 9    other states may submit a financial statement, including 10    all other covered states, if the statement breaks out 11    financial information pertinent to Illinois; 12        (3) a breakdown of the type and manifested weight of 13    covered products collected by the stewardship program for 14    each collection site and the number of covered entities 15    who brought covered products to each collection site; 16        (4) the name and address of each collection site used 17    to collect covered products, including an up-to-date map 18    indicating the location of all collection sites;19        (5) the name and address of each person transporting 20    the covered products for final disposition;21        (6) a breakdown of the final disposition of the 22    covered products including a list of the facilities used 23    in the disposition of the covered products that includes 24    the name and geographic location of the facilities, the 25    covered products managed at each facility, and any 26    violations of environmental laws, rules, or regulations   HB4546- 24 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1    over the previous 3 years at each facility; 2        (7) an assessment of whether the collection 3    convenience standard requirements in Section 50 have been 4    met or not; 5        (8) a description of the education and communication 6    efforts, including examples of marketing materials and 7    efforts used, including an assessment of the success of 8    the educational efforts; and 9        (9) any recommendations for changes to the stewardship 10    program. 11    (b) Proprietary information submitted to the Agency under 12this Act is exempted from disclosure as provided under 13paragraphs (g) and (mm) of subsection (1) of Section 7 of the 14Freedom of Information Act. 15    (c) Within 30 days after Agency approval of the annual 16report, the annual report shall be posted to the single, 17coordinated website required under Section 40. 18    Section 60. Fee and Agency role.19    (a) By July 1, 2027, and by July 1 of each year thereafter, 20a stewardship organization shall pay to the Agency an annual 21fee set by the Agency by rule. If there is more than one 22stewardship organization, the stewardship organizations shall 23equitably split the annual fee under this Section. The fee 24shall cover the Agency's full costs of implementing, 25administering, and enforcing this Act. The annual fee shall be   HB4546- 25 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1deposited into the Solid Waste Management Fund to be used for 2costs associated with the administration of this Act. 3    (b) The responsibilities of the Agency in implementing, 4administering, and enforcing this Act include: 5        (1) reviewing submitted stewardship plans and plan 6    amendments and making determinations as to whether to 7    approve the plan or plan amendment; 8        (2) reviewing annual reports submitted under Section 9    55 to ensure compliance with that Section; 10        (3) maintaining a link on its website to the single, 11    coordinated website required under paragraph (5) of 12    subsection (a) of Section 40; 13        (4) maintaining the list of registered manufacturers 14    on its website; and 15        (5) providing technical assistance to producers, 16    retailers, and collection sites related to the 17    requirements of this Act. 18    Section 65. Antitrust immunity. The activities authorized 19by this Act require collaboration among the covered 20manufacturers and the collection sites. These activities will 21enable safe and secure collection, transportation, and 22disposal of covered products in Illinois and are, therefore, 23in the best interest of the public. The benefits of 24collaboration, together with active State supervision, 25outweigh potential adverse impacts. Therefore, the General   HB4546- 26 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1Assembly intends to exempt State antitrust laws and provide 2immunity through the state action doctrine from federal 3antitrust laws, activities that are undertaken under this Act 4that might otherwise be constrained by such laws. The General 5Assembly does not intend to authorize any person or entity to 6engage in activities not provided for by this Act, and the 7General Assembly neither exempts nor provides immunity for 8such activities. 9    Section 70. Rulemaking authority. The Agency may adopt any 10rules that are necessary and that are consistent with the 11provisions of this Act. 12    Section 75. Penalties and civil actions.13    (a) Any person who violates any provision of this Act is 14liable for a civil penalty of $7,000 per violation, except 15that failure to pay a fee under this Act shall cause the person 16who fails to pay the fee to be liable for a civil penalty that 17is double the applicable fee. 18    (b) The penalties provided in this Section may be 19recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the People 20of the State of Illinois by the State's Attorney of the county 21in which the violation occurred or by the Attorney General. 22Any penalties collected under this Section in an action in 23which the Attorney General has prevailed shall be deposited 24into the Environmental Protection Trust Fund, to be used in   HB4546- 27 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1accordance with the provisions of the Environmental Protection 2Trust Fund Act. 3    (c) The Attorney General or the State's Attorney of a 4county in which a violation occurs may institute a civil 5action for an injunction, prohibitory or mandatory, to 6restrain violations of this Act or to require such actions as 7may be necessary to address violations of this Act. 8    (d) The penalties and injunctions provided in this Act are 9in addition to any penalties, injunctions, or other relief 10provided under any other State law. Nothing in this Act bars a 11cause of action by the State for any other penalty, 12injunction, or other relief provided by any other law. 13    (e) Any person who makes a false, fictitious, or 14fraudulent material statement, orally or in writing, to the 15Agency, related to or required by this Act or any rule adopted 16under this Act commits a Class 4 felony, and each such 17statement or writing shall be considered a separate Class 4 18felony. A person who, after being convicted under this 19subsection, violates this subsection a second or subsequent 20time commits a Class 3 felony. 21    Section 80. Collection of covered products using premium 22collection service. Nothing in this Act shall prevent or 23prohibit a person from offering or performing a fee-based, 24household collection of covered products provided such 25person's premium collection services must be performed in   HB4546- 28 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1compliance with all applicable federal, State, and local laws 2and requirements, including, but not limited to, all 3applicable U.S. Department of Transportation laws and 4regulations, and all applicable provisions of the 5Environmental Protection Act. Such person collecting covered 6products may make available to the stewardship organization 7some or all of the covered products collected using premium 8collection service at no expense. After consolidation of some 9or all of the covered products at the person's facilities, the 10transport to and processing of such covered products by the 11stewardship organization's processors of some or all of the 12covered products shall be at the stewardship organization's 13expense. The stewardship organization may count the households 14serviced by premium collection service toward the collection 15and convenience standard requirements in Section 50 of this 16Act. 17    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 18severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.  HB4546- 29 -LRB104 16613 BDA 30014 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    New Act